District of Columbia statutes.
49-501

Designation of military courts.

The military courts of the District of Columbia shall be: General courts-martial, special courts-martial, the summary courts-martial, and courts of inquiry, as now or hereafter provided by law.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328, § 50
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 54
1981 Ed., § 39-801.
1973 Ed., § 39-701.